Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202284-1227
Records Management Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby established in the state treasury a special fund to be known as the Records Management Cash Fund which, when appropriated by the Legislature, shall be expended by the Secretary of State for the purposes of providing records management services and assistance to state and local agencies, for development and maintenance of the portal for providing electronic access to public records or electronic information and services, and for grants to a state or local agency as provided in subdivision (1)(j) of section 84-1204. All fees and charges for the purpose of records management services and analysis received by the Secretary of State from the local agencies shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to such fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund, the Secretary of State Cash Fund, or the Election Administration Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Records Management Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1984, LB 527, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 149;

Laws 1997, LB 590, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 257, § 2;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 93;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 30;

Laws 2016, LB957, § 14;

Laws 2018, LB945, § 27;

Laws 2019, LB298, § 20;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 38.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.